Maryland, session 2026, HB1595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1595*

HOUSE BILL 1595
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
(5) (i) “Qualified data center” means a data center located in the State
in which an individual or a corporation, within 3 years after submitting an application for
the sales and use tax exemption under this section, has:
1. for a data center located within a Tier I area, invested at
least $2,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least five
qualified positions; or
2. for a data center located in any other area of the State,
invested at least $5,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least
five qualified positions.
(ii) “Qualified data center” includes:
1. a data center that is a co–located or hosting data center
where equipment, space, and bandwidth are available to lease to multiple customers; and
2. an enterprise data center owned and operated by the
company it supports.
Article – Tax – Property
6–202.1.
(A) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county may establish, by law, a subclass of real property consisting of vacant lots or
improved property cited as vacant and unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a
housing or building violation notice.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LAW, A SUBCLASS OF PERSONAL
PROPERTY CONSISTING OF ALL THE PERSONAL PROPERTY OF A QUALIFIED DATA
CENTER AS DEFINED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
6–302.

HOUSE BILL 1595 3
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (E) of this
section and §§ 6–305 and 6–306 of this subtitle:
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.
(E) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY SET A SINGLE SPECIAL PERSONAL PROPERTY
TAX RATE FOR ALL THE PERSONAL PROPERTY OF A QUALIFIED DATA CENTER AS
DEFINED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.